Virginia statutes. Title 59.1. Trade and Commerce.
Chapter 17. Virginia Consumer Protection Act.
§ 59.1-200.1.
Prohibited practices; foreclosure rescue.

In addition to the provisions of § 59.1-200, the following fraudulent acts or practices committed by a supplier, as defined in § 59.1-198, in a consumer transaction involving residential real property owned and occupied as the primary dwelling unit of
the owner, are prohibited:

The supplier of service to avoid or prevent foreclosure charges or receives a fee (i) prior to the full and complete performance of the services it has agreed to perform, if the transaction does not involve the sale or transfer of residential real property,
or (ii) prior to the settlement on the sale or transfer of residential real property, if the transaction involves the sale or transfer of such residential real property;

The supplier of such services (i) fails to make payments under the mortgage or deed of trust that is a lien on such residential real property as the payments become due, where the supplier has agreed to do so, regardless of whether the purchaser is obligated
on the loan, and (ii) applies rents received from such dwellings for his own use;

The supplier of such services represents to the seller of such residential real property that the seller has an option to repurchase such residential real property, after the supplier of such services takes legal or equitable title to such residential
real property, unless there is a written contract providing such option to repurchase on terms and at a price stated in such contract; or

The supplier advertises or offers such services as are prohibited by this section.

This section shall not apply to any mortgage lender or servicer regularly engaged in making or servicing mortgage loans that is subject to the supervisory authority of the State Corporation Commission, a comparable regulatory authority of another state,
or a federal banking agency.

In connection with any consumer transaction covered by subsection A, any provision in an agreement between the supplier of such services and the owner of such residential real property that requires the owner to submit to mandatory arbitration shall be
null and void, and notwithstanding any such provisions, the owner of such residential real property shall have the rights and remedies under this chapter.

History.
2008, c. 485; 2009, cc. 203, 272.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 203 and 272 are identical, and rewrote subdivision A 1, which read: “The supplier of service to avoid or prevent foreclosure is to be paid a fee prior to the settlement on a sale of such residential real property, regardless
of whether the fee is charged or collected as part of the transaction involving a sale of such residential real property”; and in subsection C, substituted “In connection with any consumer transaction covered by subsection A, any”
for “Any” and “between the supplier of such services and” for “with.”

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Allegations sufficient. —

Individual’s demurrer to the Attorney General’s Virginia Consumer Protection Act, § 59.1-198 et seq., claims was denied as actions brought on behalf of the Commonwealth were intended to be broader in scope and remedy than private causes of action, and
the complaint adequately alleged that the actions of the corporation were those of the individual, both directly and as an active participant in the corporation. Commonwealth ex rel. Herring v. Serv. Dogs by Warren Retrievers, Inc.,
107 Va. Cir. 333, 2021 Va. Cir. LEXIS 104 (Madison County Mar. 9, 2021).

§ 59.1-201.
Civil investigative orders.

Whenever the attorney for the Commonwealth or the attorney for a county, city, or town has reasonable cause to believe that any person has engaged in, or is engaging in, or is about to engage in, any violation of § 59.1-200 or 59.1-200.1, the attorney
for the Commonwealth or the attorney for a county, city, or town if, after making a good faith effort to obtain such information, is unable to obtain the data and information necessary to determine whether such violation has occurred,
or that it is impractical for him to do so, he may apply to the circuit court within whose jurisdiction the person having information resides, or has its principal place of business, for an investigative order requiring such person
to furnish to the attorney for the Commonwealth or attorney for a county, city, or town such data and information as is relevant to the subject matter of the investigation.

The circuit courts are empowered to issue investigative orders, authorizing discovery by the same methods and procedures as set forth for civil actions in the Rules of the Supreme Court of Virginia, in connection with investigations of violations of §
59.1-200 or 59.1-200.1 by the attorney for the Commonwealth or the attorney for a county, city, or town. An application for an investigative order shall identify:

The specific act or practice alleged to be in violation of § 59.1-200 or 59.1-200.1;

The grounds which shall demonstrate reasonable cause to believe that a violation of § 59.1-200 or 59.1-200.1 may have occurred, may be occurring or may be about to occur;

The category or class of data or information requested in the investigative order; and

The reasons why the attorney for the Commonwealth or attorney for a county, city, or town is unable to obtain such data and information, or the reason why it is impractical to do so, without a court order.

Within 21 days after the service upon a person of an investigative order, or at any time before the return date specified in such order, whichever is later, such person may file a motion to modify or set aside such investigative order or to seek a protective
order as provided by the Rules of the Supreme Court of Virginia. Such motion shall specify the grounds for modifying or setting aside the order, and may be based upon the failure of the application or the order to comply with the
requirements of this section, or upon any constitutional or other legal basis or privilege of such person.

Where the information requested by an investigative order may be derived or ascertained from the business records of the person upon whom the order is served, or from an examination, audit or inspection of such business records, or from a compilation,
abstract or summary thereof, and the burden of deriving or ascertaining the information is substantially the same for the attorney for the Commonwealth or attorney for a county, city, or town as for the person from whom such information
is requested, it shall be sufficient for that person to specify the records from which the requested information may be derived or ascertained, and to afford the attorney for the Commonwealth or attorney for the county, city, or
town reasonable opportunity to examine, audit or inspect such records and to make copies, compilations, abstracts or summaries thereof.

It shall be the duty of the attorney for the Commonwealth or attorney for a county, city, or town, his assistants, employees and agents, to maintain the secrecy of all evidence, documents, data and information obtained through the use of investigative
orders or obtained as a result of the voluntary act of the person under investigation and it shall be unlawful for any person participating in such investigations to disclose to any other person not participating in such investigation
any information so obtained. Any person violating this subsection shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor and shall be punished in accordance with §

18.2-11

. Notwithstanding the foregoing, this section shall not preclude the presentation and disclosure of any information obtained pursuant to this section in any suit or action in any court of this Commonwealth wherein
it is alleged that a violation of § 59.1-200 or 59.1-200.1 has occurred, is occurring or may occur, nor shall this section prevent the disclosure of any such information by the attorney for the Commonwealth or attorney for a county,
city, or town to any federal or state law-enforcement authority that has restrictions governing confidentiality and the use of such information similar to those contained in this subsection; however, such disclosures may only be
made as to information obtained after July 1, 1979.

Upon the failure of a person without lawful excuse to obey an investigative order under this section, the attorney for the Commonwealth or attorney for the county, city, or town may initiate contempt proceedings in the circuit court that issued the order
to hold such person in contempt.

No information, facts or data obtained through an investigative order shall be admissible in any civil or criminal proceeding other than for the enforcement of this chapter and the remedies provided herein.

History.
1977, c. 635; 1979, c. 493; 1982, c. 13; 1987, c. 464; 1995, c. 703; 2008, c. 485.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 485 inserted “or 59.1-200.1” following “§ 59.1-200” throughout this section; and substituted “21 days” for “twenty-one days” in subsection C.

Law Review.

For article, “Determining the Deception of Sexual Orientation Change Efforts,” see 58 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 641 (2016).

§ 59.1-201.1.
Attorney General empowered to issue civil investigative demands.

Whenever the Attorney General has reasonable cause to believe that any person has engaged in, or is engaging in, or is about to engage in, any violation of this chapter, the Attorney General is empowered to issue a civil investigative demand. The provisions
of § 59.1-9.10 shall apply mutatis mutandis to civil investigative demands issued pursuant to this section.

History.
1995, c. 703.

§ 59.1-202.
Assurances of voluntary compliance.

The Attorney General, the attorney for the Commonwealth, or the attorney for a county, city, or town may accept an assurance of voluntary compliance with this chapter from any person subject to the provisions of this chapter. Any such assurance shall
be in writing and be filed with and be subject on petition to the approval of the appropriate circuit court. Such assurance of voluntary compliance shall not be considered an admission of guilt or a violation for any purpose. Such
assurance of voluntary compliance may at any time be reopened by the Attorney General, or the attorney for the Commonwealth, or attorney for the county, city, or town respectively, for additional orders or decrees to enforce the
assurance of voluntary compliance.

When an assurance is presented to the circuit court for approval, the Attorney General, the attorney for the Commonwealth, or the attorney for the appropriate county, city, or town shall file, in the form of a motion for judgment or complaint, the allegations
which form the basis for the entry of the assurance. The assurance may provide by its terms for any relief which an appropriate circuit court could grant, including but not limited to restitution, arbitration of disputes between
the supplier and its customers, investigative expenses, civil penalties and costs; provided, however, that nothing in this chapter shall be construed to authorize or require the Commonwealth, the Attorney General, an attorney for
the Commonwealth or the attorney for any county, city or town to participate in arbitration of violations under this section.

History.
1977, c. 635; 1981, c. 423; 1982, c. 13; 1988, c. 850.

§ 59.1-203.
Restraining prohibited acts.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, the Attorney General, any attorney for the Commonwealth, or the attorney for any city, county, or town may cause an action to be brought in the appropriate circuit court in the name of the Commonwealth,
or of the county, city, or town to enjoin any violation of § 59.1-200 or 59.1-200.1. The circuit court having jurisdiction may enjoin such violations notwithstanding the existence of an adequate remedy at law. In any action under
this section, it shall not be necessary that damages be proved.

Unless the Attorney General, any attorney for the Commonwealth, or the attorney for any county, city, or town determines that a person subject to the provisions of this chapter intends to depart from this Commonwealth or to remove his property herefrom,
or to conceal himself or his property herein, or on a reasonable determination that irreparable harm may occur if immediate action is not taken, he shall, before initiating any legal proceedings as provided in this section, give
notice in writing that such proceedings are contemplated, and allow such person a reasonable opportunity to appear before said attorney and show that a violation did not occur or execute an assurance of voluntary compliance, as
provided in § 59.1-202.

The circuit courts are authorized to issue temporary or permanent injunctions to restrain and prevent violations of § 59.1-200 or 59.1-200.1.

The Commissioner of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services, or his duly authorized representative, shall have the power to inquire into possible violations of subdivisions A 18, 28, 29, 31, 39, and 41, as it relates to motor fuels, of § 59.1-200
and § 59.1-335.12, and, if necessary, to request, but not to require, an appropriate legal official to bring an action to enjoin such violation.

History.
1977, c. 635; 1982, c. 13; 1988, c. 485; 2008, c. 485; 2012, cc. 803, 835.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 16 provides: “That the Governor may transfer an appropriation or any portion thereof within a state agency established, abolished, or otherwise affected by the provisions of the 13th enactment of this act, or from one such
agency to another, to support the changes in organization or responsibility resulting from or required by the provisions of the 13th enactment of this act, provided that any such transfer shall be limited to salary and fringe benefits
for any personnel transferred and reasonable administrative overhead and costs.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 485 inserted “or 59.1-200.1” following “§ 59.1-200” throughout this section.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 13, are identical, and substituted “subdivisions A 18, 28, 29, 31, 39, and 41, as it relates to motor fuels, of § 59.1-200 and § 59.1-335.12” for “§ 59.1-200 or 59.1-200.1” in subsection D.

§ 59.1-204.
Individual action for damages or penalty.

Any person who suffers loss as the result of a violation of this chapter shall be entitled to initiate an action to recover actual damages, or $500, whichever is greater. If the trier of fact finds that the violation was willful, it may increase damages
to an amount not exceeding three times the actual damages sustained, or $1,000, whichever is greater. Any person who accepts a cure offer under this chapter may not initiate or maintain any other or additional action based on any
cause of action arising under any other statute or common law theory if such other action is substantially based on the same allegations of fact on which the action initiated under this chapter is based.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, in addition to any damages awarded, such person also may be awarded reasonable attorneys’ fees and court costs.

No cure offer shall be admissible in any proceeding initiated under this section, unless the cure offer is delivered by a supplier to the person claiming loss or to any attorney representing such person, prior to the filing of the supplier’s initial responsive
pleading in such proceeding. If the cure offer is timely delivered by the supplier, then the supplier may introduce the cure offer into evidence at trial. The supplier shall not be liable for such person’s attorneys’ fees and court
costs incurred following delivery of the cure offer unless the actual damages found to have been sustained and awarded, without consideration of attorneys’ fees and court costs, exceed the value of the cure offer.

In any action which the parties desire to settle all matters in dispute, the question of whether the plaintiff shall be awarded reasonable attorneys’ fees and court costs in accordance with subsections B and C may be tendered to the court for consideration
of the amount of such an award, if any.

History.
1977, c. 635; 1995, cc. 703, 726; 2004, cc. 41, 90; 2005, c. 250; 2006, c. 453.

Cross references.

As to definition of cure offer, see § 59.1-198.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 41 and 90 are nearly identical, and added subsection C. Subsection C is set out in the form above at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 250 added subsection D and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 453 added the last sentence in subsection A.

Law Review.

For article, “Determining the Deception of Sexual Orientation Change Efforts,” see 58 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 641 (2016).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
5A M.J. Costs, § 3; 20 M.J. Witnesses, § 2.

§ 59.1-204.1.
Tolling of limitation.

Any individual action pursuant to § 59.1-204 for which the right to bring such action first accrues on or after July 1, 1995, shall be commenced within two years after such accrual. The cause of action shall accrue as provided in §

8.01-230

.

When any of the authorized government agencies files suit under this chapter, the time during which such governmental suit and all appeals therefrom is pending shall not be counted as any part of the period within which an action under § 59.1-204 shall
be brought.

History.
1988, c. 241; 1995, cc. 703, 726.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
12A M.J. Limitation of Actions, §§ 24, 35, 53.

§ 59.1-205.
Additional relief.

The circuit court may make such additional orders or decrees as may be necessary to restore to any identifiable person any money or property, real, personal, or mixed, tangible or intangible, which may have been acquired from such person by means of any
act or practice declared to be unlawful in § 59.1-200 or 59.1-200.1, provided, that such person shall be identified by order of the court within 180 days from the date of the order permanently enjoining the unlawful act or practice.

History.
1977, c. 635; 2008, c. 485.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 485 inserted “or 59.1-200.1” following “§ 59.1-200” near the end of this section.

§ 59.1-206.
Civil penalties; attorney’s fees.

In any action brought under this chapter, if the court finds that a person has willfully engaged in an act or practice in violation of § 59.1-200 or 59.1-200.1, the Attorney General, the attorney for the Commonwealth, or the attorney for the county, city,
or town may recover for the Literary Fund, upon petition to the court, a civil penalty of not more than $2,500 per violation. For purposes of this section, prima facie evidence of a willful violation may be shown when the Attorney
General, the attorney for the Commonwealth, or the attorney for the county, city, or town notifies the alleged violator by certified mail that an act or practice is a violation of § 59.1-200 or 59.1-200.1, and the alleged violator,
after receipt of said notice, continues to engage in the act or practice.

Any person who willfully violates the terms of an assurance of voluntary compliance or an injunction issued under § 59.1-203 shall forfeit and pay to the Literary Fund a civil penalty of not more than $5,000 per violation. For purposes of this section,
the circuit court issuing an injunction shall retain jurisdiction, and the cause shall be continued, and in such cases the Attorney General, the attorney for the Commonwealth, or the attorney for the county, city, or town may petition
for recovery of civil penalties.

In any action pursuant to subsection A or B and in addition to any other amount awarded, the Attorney General, the attorney for the Commonwealth, or the attorney for the county, city, or town may recover any applicable civil penalty or penalties, costs,
reasonable expenses incurred by the state or local agency in investigating and preparing the case not to exceed $1,000 per violation, and attorney’s fees. Such civil penalty or penalties, costs, reasonable expenses, and attorney’s
fees shall be paid into the general fund of the Commonwealth or of the county, city, or town which such attorney represented.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as limiting the power of the court to punish as contempt the violation of any order issued by the court, or as limiting the power of the court to enter other orders under § 59.1-203 or 59.1-205.

The right of trial by jury as provided by law shall be preserved in actions brought under this section.

History.
1977, c. 635; 1980, c. 171; 1982, c. 13; 1991, c. 156; 1995, c. 703; 2008, c. 485.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 485 inserted “or 59.1-200.1” following “§ 59.1-200” in the first sentence in subsection A and made a minor stylistic change.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Scope. —

Individual’s demurrer to the Attorney General’s Virginia Consumer Protection Act, § 59.1-198 et seq., claims was denied as actions brought on behalf of the Commonwealth were intended to be broader in scope and remedy than private causes of action, and
the complaint adequately alleged that the actions of the corporation were those of the individual, both directly and as an active participant in the corporation. Commonwealth ex rel. Herring v. Serv. Dogs by Warren Retrievers, Inc.,
107 Va. Cir. 333, 2021 Va. Cir. LEXIS 104 (Madison County Mar. 9, 2021).

Right to jury trial. —

In the State’s action defendants alleging violations of the Virginia Consumer Protection Act (VCPA) and the Virginia Solicitation of Contributions law, the court held that defendants were entitled to a jury on the issue of civil penalties under the (VCPA)
because civil penalties required the possible assessment of monetary damages but not on the issues of injunctive relief, including restitution and attorney’s fees. Commonwealth v. Serv. Dogs by Warren Retrievers, 101 Va. Cir. 275,
2019 Va. Cir. LEXIS 37 (Madison County Mar. 10, 2019).

In the State’s action defendants alleging violations of the Virginia Consumer Protection Act (VCPA) and the Virginia Solicitation of Contributions law (VSOC), the court held that restitution and injunctive relief under the VCPA and VSOC was an equitable
principle and defendant was not entitled to a jury trial on that issue. Commonwealth v. Serv. Dogs by Warren Retrievers, 101 Va. Cir. 275, 2019 Va. Cir. LEXIS 37 (Madison County Mar. 10, 2019).

Insurer not liable for attorney fees in absence of bad faith. —

Homeowners who succeeded in obtaining a judgment by confession from an insurer who defaulted on their complaint alleging breach of contract and other matters in regard to the insurer’s failure to pay more than the policy limits after their home was destroyed
by fire were not entitled to attorney fees under either the Virginia Consumer Protection Act or §

38.2-209

because the insurer did not act in bad faith or committ fraud by paying just the policy limits, even though the homeowners were ultimately awarded a damage judgment against the insurer. Le Morzellec v. Loudoun Mut. Ins.
Co., 2004 Va. Cir. LEXIS 218 (Fairfax County July 26, 2004).

§ 59.1-207.
Unintentional violations.

In any case arising under this chapter, no liability shall be imposed upon a supplier who shows by a preponderance of the evidence that (i) the act or practice alleged to be in violation of § 59.1-200 or 59.1-200.1 was an act or practice of the manufacturer
or distributor to the supplier over which the supplier had no control or (ii) the alleged violation resulted from a bona fide error notwithstanding the maintenance of procedures reasonably adopted to avoid a violation; however, nothing
in this section shall prevent the court from ordering restitution and payment of reasonable attorney’s fees and court costs pursuant to § 59.1-204 B to individuals aggrieved as a result of an unintentional violation of this chapter.

History.
1977, c. 635; 1995, cc. 703, 726; 2008, c. 485.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 485 inserted “or 59.1-200.1” following “§ 59.1-200” in clause (i).